Missouri, session 2026, SB1328.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 9, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 9.025, to read as
follows:
9.025. The month of January is hereby designated as
"Blood Donor Awareness Month". It is recommended to the
people of this state that the month be appropriately
observed through activities that increase awareness of the
importance of blood donation. The state deems blood and
blood products to be a critical resource and a vital public
health asset that must be readily available at all times.
✓